Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2. Attachment

Denial of grounds by affidavit casts additional burden on plaintiff.
—

An additional burden of proof rests upon plaintiff when the grounds for attachment are positively denied by the defendant in an affidavit in support of a motion to discharge. Smith v. Varel Mfg. Co., 378 P.2d 680,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1963) (decided under prior law).

He must show circumstances other than voluntary conveyance.
—

To sustain an attachment on the ground of transfer with intent to defraud creditors against a motion to discharge there must be a showing of some circumstance other than a mere voluntary transfer, since that alone might be consistent with many facts indicating the transfer to be without the intent to defraud defendant's creditors. Smith v. Varel Mfg. Co., 378 P.2d 680,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1963) (decided under prior law).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

6 Am. Jur. 2d Attachment and Garnishment § 1 et seq.

7 C.J.S. Attachment § 1 et seq.

§ 1-15-201.
When attachment may issue; affidavit.

Subject to W.S.

1-15-101

through

1-15-108

and the provisions of this article, at any time after the filing of the complaint in a civil action for the recovery of money, the plaintiff may have the property of the defendant not exempt from execution attached as security for the satisfaction of any judgment that may be recovered.

Before a writ of attachment is issued, the plaintiff shall file with the court in which the action is pending an affidavit stating:

That the defendant is indebted to the plaintiff, specifying the amount of the indebtedness over and above all legal setoffs and the nature of the indebtedness;

That the attachment is not sought to hinder, delay or defraud any creditor of the defendant;

That the payment of the indebtedness has not been secured by any mortgage or lien upon real or personal property in this state, or, if originally so secured, that the security has, without any act of the plaintiff or the person to whom the security was given, become impaired; and

Any one (1) or more of the following grounds for attachment:

That the defendant is not a resident of this state;

That the defendant is a foreign corporation, not qualified to do business in this state;

That the defendant stands in defiance of an officer, or conceals himself so that process cannot be served upon him;

That the defendant has assigned, removed, disposed of or concealed, or is about to assign, remove, dispose of or conceal, any of his property with intent to defraud his creditors;

That the defendant has departed or is about to depart from the state to the injury of his creditors;

That the defendant fraudulently or criminally contracted the debt or incurred the obligation respecting which the action is brought.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 125, 128; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 521, 522; R.S. 1887, §§ 2869, 2870, 3541, 3544; Laws 1890, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3988, 3989, 4452, 4455; Laws 1905, ch. 38, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 4847, 4848, 5315, 5318; C.S. 1920, §§ 6117, 6118, 6587, 6590; Laws 1923, ch. 23, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1601, 62-1604, 89-3301, 89-3302; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5001, 3-5002, 14-1401, 14-1404; Laws 1955, ch. 77, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-226, 1-227, 1-571, 1-574; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-15-101

,

1-15-102

,

1-21-301

,

1-21-301

, 1-21-304; Laws 1985, ch. 194, § 2; 1986, ch. 62, § 1; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Statement in words of section initially sufficient. —

The supreme court has held a statement in the words employed by this section to be initially sufficient. Smith v. Varel Mfg. Co., 378 P.2d 680,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1963).

Attachment affidavit following statutory language so closely as to present equivalent of statutory language is sufficient. Wakefield & Co. v. Bell, 42 Wyo. 355, 294 P. 785,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1930).

To sustain attachment on ground of transfer with intent to defraud

creditors against a motion to discharge, the intent to cheat, defraud and delay the plaintiff-creditor must exist as a fact. Smith v. Varel Mfg. Co., 378 P.2d 680,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1963).

Voluntary conveyance of property by debtor on verge of bankruptcy

raises a presumption of an intention to defraud creditors, and unless the presumption is satisfactorily rebutted by the grantors, the conveyance will be ground for an attachment. Smith v. Varel Mfg. Co., 378 P.2d 680,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1963).

Attachment lies for recovery of unliquidated damages. —

Under this section, authorizing issuance of an attachment in a civil action for recovery of money, an attachment will lie for the recovery of unliquidated damages for unlawful and forcible entry. Collins v. Stanley, 15 Wyo. 282, 88 P. 620,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1907) (decided under prior law).

But not where only part of debt fraudulently contracted. —

Under this section, an attachment will be dissolved when the evidence shows that only part of debt was fraudulently contracted. C.D. Smith Drug Co. v. Casper Drug Co., 5 Wyo. 510, 40 P. 979,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1895), rehearing denied, 5 Wyo. 520, 42 P. 213 (Wyo. 1895) (decided under prior law).

Support garnishments have priority. —

Support garnishments have priority and where they result in the withholding of 25 percent or more of an employee's disposable earnings, creditor garnishment is impermissible. Union Pac. R.R. v. Trona Valley Fed. Credit Union, 2002 WY 165, 57 P.3d 1203,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes a fraudulently contracted debt or fraudulently incurred liability or obligation within purview of statute authorizing attachment on such grounds, 39 ALR2d 1265.

Proof of a fraudulently contracted debt or fraudulently incurred liability or obligation within purview of statute authorizing attachment on such grounds, 39 ALR2d 1265.

Joint bank account as subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution by creditor of one joint depositor, 86 ALR5th 527.

§ 1-15-202.
Issuance of writ; contents.

If authorized by a written order of the court pursuant to W.S. 1-15-103(a)(i), the clerk shall issue the writ of attachment upon the filing by the plaintiff of the bond required by W.S.

1-15-104

.

The plaintiff may have other writs of attachment issued as often as he may require at any time before judgment, based upon the original affidavit and bond, if the amount of the bond is sufficient.

In actions pending in district court or circuit court several writs may be issued at the same time to the sheriff of any county.

The writ shall be issued in the name of the state of Wyoming and shall be directed to the sheriff of any county in which property of the defendant is located and shall require him to attach and safely keep all the property of the defendant within his jurisdiction not exempt from execution, or so much thereof as may be sufficient to satisfy the plaintiff’s demand, the amount of which shall be stated in conformity with the complaint.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 127; Laws 1884, ch. 52, § 1; 1886, ch. 60, §§ 524, 525; R.S. 1887, §§ 2872, 2873, 3543; Laws 1895, ch. 4, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3991, 3992, 4454; C.S. 1910, §§ 4850, 4861, 5317; C.S. 1920, §§ 6120, 6121, 6589; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1603, 89-3304, 89-3305; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5004, 3-5005, 14-1403; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-229, 1-230, 1-573; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-15-104

,

1-15-105

, 1-21-303; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 2000, ch. 24, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to property exempt from execution or attachment generally, see chapter 20 of this title.

As to exemption of interest in prepaid or prearranged funeral contracts, see §

26-32-102

.

For provision that the seal of a notary public shall not be levied upon or sold, see §

32-1-106

.

For provision that funds held in perpetual care with reference to cemeteries shall not be liable to attachment, garnishment or other processes, see §

35-8-103

.

Debtor lacked standing to contend section is unconstitutional

because it allows the clerk of court to issue a writ of attachment, where the writ of attachment in her case was issued by the district judge, not the clerk of court. Sturman v. First Nat'l Bank, 729 P.2d 667,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 646

(Wyo. 1986).

Writ of attachment is jurisdictional

to obtain jurisdiction of the subject matter. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

Fact writ of attachment was made returnable on same day on which it was issued was not fatal

where the garnishee appeared and answered in the case and made no motion to quash the service, thus waiving the defect. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

Writ of prohibition. —

Where goods have been seized on attachment, judgment rendered and goods ordered sold, supreme court will not issue writ of prohibition even though the district court had no jurisdiction. Dobson v. Westheimer, 5 Wyo. 34, 36 P. 626,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1894).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Enforcement of Civil Liability for Non-Support in the State of Wyoming,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1954).

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of affidavit respecting intent to defraud as against objection that it is a mere legal conclusion, 8 ALR2d 578.

§ 1-15-203.
Manner of executing writ.

If the undertaking provided for in W.S. 1-15-105(a) is not given by the defendant at or before the time the writ is executed, the sheriff to whom the writ is directed shall execute the writ without delay in the following manner:

Real property owned in the name of the defendant shall be attached by filing with the county clerk a copy of the writ, together with a description of the property attached, and a notice that it is attached, and by leaving a copy of the writ, description and notice with an occupant of the property, or if there is no occupant, by posting the copy of the writ, description and notice in a conspicuous place on the property attached;

Growing crops, which until severed shall be deemed personal property not capable of manual delivery, growing upon real property owned in the name of the defendant shall be attached by filing with the county clerk a copy of the writ, together with a description of the growing crops to be attached, and of the real property upon which the crops are growing, and a notice that the growing crops are attached in pursuance of the writ, and by leaving a copy of the writ, description and notice with an occupant of the real property, or if there is no occupant, by posting the copy of the writ, description and notice in a conspicuous place on the real property;

Real property or an interest therein belonging to the defendant and held in the name of any other person, shall be attached by filing with the county clerk a copy of the writ, together with a description of the property and a notice that the real property and any interest of the defendant therein held in the name of the other person, naming him, are attached, and by leaving with the occupant, if any, and with the named person or his agent, if known and within the county, or at the residence of either, if within the county, a copy of the writ, with a similar description and notice. If there is no occupant of the property, a copy of the writ, together with the description and notice, shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the property. When filed, the county clerk shall index the attachment in the names of the defendant and of the person in whose name the real property is held;

Growing crops, which until severed, shall be deemed personal property not capable of manual delivery, or any interest therein belonging to the defendant, and growing upon real property held in the name of any other person, shall be attached in the same manner as crops growing upon real property held in the name of the defendant are attached under paragraph (ii) of this subsection. The notice of attachment shall state that the crops therein described or any interest of the defendant therein, held by, or standing upon the records of the county in the name of such other person, naming him, are attached pursuant to the writ. In addition, a copy of the writ, description and notice shall be delivered to such other person, or his agent, if known and within the county, or left at the residence of either, if known and within the county. When filed, the county clerk shall index the attachment in the names of the defendant and of the person in whose name the real property is held;

Personal property capable of manual delivery shall be attached by taking it into custody;

Stocks or shares, or interest in stocks or shares, of any corporation or company shall be attached as provided by W.S.

1-19-101

through

1-19-108

;

Personal property not capable of manual delivery shall be attached by leaving a copy of the writ with the person having the property in his possession if he can be found, and by placing a conspicuous notice of levy on the property;

Personal property, other than earnings from personal services as defined by W.S. 1-15-102(a)(vi), in the possession of another person shall be attached by service of a writ of garnishment as provided by W.S.

1-15-401

through

1-15-425

;

If there are several attachments against the same defendant in different actions, they shall be executed in the order in which they are received by the sheriff.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 129; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 527, 528, 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2875, 2876, 2878 to 2882, 3545; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3994, 3995, 3997 to 4001, 4456; C.S. 1910, §§ 4853, 4854, 4856 to 4860, 5319; C.S. 1920, §§ 6123, 6124, 6126 to 6130, 6591; Laws 1921, ch. 14, § 1; 1925, ch. 92, § 1; 1931, ch. 73, § 106; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1605, 89-3307, 89-3308, 89-3310 to 89-3314, §§ 3-5007, 3-5008, 3-5010 to 3-5014, 14-1405; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-232, 1-233, 1-235 to 1-239, 1-575; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-15-107

,

1-15-108

, 1-15-110 to 1-15-114, 1-21-305; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Execution on fraudulently transferred property. —

Ordinarily, a creditor cannot attach property rightfully in custody of his deceased debtor's administrator, but this cannot apply where debtor is living and creditor attaches property fraudulently transferred by debtor to one who died while in possession of the property. Flaks, Inc. v. De Berry, 53 Wyo. 203, 79 P.2d 825,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1938).

Priority in time of service of writ of attachment determines superiority

of conflicting attachments or garnishments of the same indebtedness. Great Falls Transfer & Storage Co. v. Pan American Petroleum Corp., 353 F.2d 348, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 3762 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1965).

§ 1-15-204.
Third party claims; indemnity to sheriff; application for release.

If the sheriff executing the writ has actual notice of any third party claim to the personal property to be levied on or is in doubt as to ownership of the property, or of encumbrances thereon, or damage to the property held that may result by reason of its perishable character, he may require the plaintiff to file with the sheriff a surety bond, indemnifying the sheriff against any loss or damage by reason of the illegality of any holding or sale on execution, or by reason of damage to any personal property held under attachment. Unless a lesser amount is acceptable to the sheriff, the bond shall be in double the amount of the estimated value of the property to be seized.

Any person not a party to the action, who claims ownership or right to possession of property attached, may, at any time, either before or after judgment, be made a party on his application for the purpose of removing or discharging the attachment. The court may grant summary relief as is just, and may in proper cases try appropriate issues by jury.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 135; Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 558; R.S. 1887, §§ 2906, 3551; R.S. 1899, §§ 4025, 4462; C.S. 1910, §§ 4884, 5325; C.S. 1920, §§ 6154, 6597; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1611, 89-3338; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5038, 14-411; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-263, 1-587; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-312, 1-21-317; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Intervention. —

A claimant to money garnisheed or property attached cannot intervene and be made a party in an action to which the attachment or garnishment is auxiliary. Stanley v. Foote, 9 Wyo. 335, 63 P. 940,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1901) (decided under prior law).

Where intervener claimed an attached automobile and introduced evidence without objection, court had jurisdiction to pass upon questions raised by intervention. Steffy v. Teton Truck Line Co., 44 Wyo. 345, 11 P.2d 1082,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1932) (decided under prior law).

Costs. —

Where petition is dismissed costs may be assessed against party attempting to intervene. Stanley v. Foote, 9 Wyo. 335, 63 P. 940,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1901) (decided under prior law).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statutory provisions restricting registration of conditional sales contracts in case of residence of other states as affecting priority of lien of conditional vendor over lien of attaching creditor of conditional vendee, 10 ALR2d 764.

Right of garnishee, other than bank holding deposit, to set off claims not due or certain when garnishment is served, 57 ALR2d 700.

Right of successful intervenor or claimant of property to attorney's fees for wrongful attachment, 65 ALR2d 1426.

Right of attachment or judgment creditor, or officer standing in his shoes, to attack older lien or security interest for usury, 70 ALR2d 1409.

Post-Snidach status of banker's right to set off bank's claim against depositor's funds, 65 ALR3d 1284.

§ 1-15-205.
Return of sheriff; inventory of property.

The sheriff shall return
the writ of attachment to the court within twenty (20) days after
its receipt, together with a certificate of his actions endorsed thereon
or attached thereto. The certificate shall contain a full inventory
of the property attached.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 133, 144; Laws 1879, ch. 48, § 2; 1886, ch. 60, §§ 526, 537; R.S. 1887, §§ 2874, 2885, 3549, 3560; R.S. 1899, §§ 3993, 4004, 4460, 4471; C.S. 1910, §§ 4852, 4863, 5323, 5334; C.S. 1920, §§ 6122, 6133, 6595, 6606; Laws 1927, ch. 76, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1609, 62-1620, 89-3306, 89-3317; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5006, 3-5017, 14-1409, 14-1421; w.S. 1957, §§ 1-231, 1-242, 1-585, 1-597; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-15-106

, 1-15-117, 1-21-315, 1-21-327; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Notice of garnishment to be endorsed on original writ. —

Under this section, the fact that notice of garnishment has been given should be endorsed on the original writ of attachment. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

Waiver of nonjurisdictional defects. —

Defects in the sheriff's return were not, under the facts as disclosed by the record, jurisdictional and were waived when the garnishee appeared and answered generally. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

§ 1-15-206.
Examination of defendant.

The defendant may be
required to appear before the court or a master appointed by the court,
to be examined on oath respecting his property. After any examination
conducted pursuant to this section, the court or master may order
personal property capable of manual delivery to be delivered to the
officer, on any terms as are just, having reference to any liens on
or claims against the personal property, and may require a memorandum
of the amount and description of all other personal property. The
court shall make provision for witness fees and mileage as is just.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 132; R.S. 1887, § 3548; R.S. 1899, § 4459; C.S. 1910, § 5322; C.S. 1920, § 6594; R.S. 1931, § 62-1608; C.S. 1945, § 14-1408; W.S. 1957, § 1-578; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-21-308; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 1.

§ 1-15-207.
Sale of attached property before judgment.

If any of the property attached is perishable, the sheriff shall sell it in the manner in which property is sold on execution. The sheriff shall retain the proceeds and other property attached by him to answer any judgment that may be recovered in the action, unless released or discharged, or subjected to execution upon another judgment recovered previous to issuing the attachment.

When property has been taken by an officer under a writ of attachment and the court is satisfied that the interest of the parties to the action will be served by a sale, the court may order the property sold in the same manner as property sold under an execution, and the proceeds deposited in the court to be disbursed pursuant to the judgment in the action. The order shall be made only upon notice to the adverse party if the party has been personally served or has entered an appearance in the action.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 134; Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 544; R.S. 1887, §§ 2892, 3550; R.S. 1899, §§ 4011, 4461; C.S. 1910, §§ 4870, 5324; C.S. 1920, §§ 6140, 6596; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1610, 89-3324; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5024, 14-1410; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-249, 1-586; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-15-206

, 1-21-316; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of provision for execution sale on short notice, or sale in advance of judgment under writ of attachment, where property involved is subject to decay or depreciation, 3 ALR3d 593.

§ 1-15-208.
Satisfaction of judgment; deficiency; redelivery of property.

If judgment is recovered by the plaintiff, the sheriff shall satisfy it out of the attached property which has not been delivered to the defendant or to a claimant pursuant to W.S.

1-15-105

, or subjected to a prior lien, by paying to the plaintiff the proceeds of all sales of perishable property sold by the sheriff, or of any debts or credits collected by the sheriff or as much as is necessary to satisfy the judgment. If any balance remains due and an execution has issued on the judgment, the sheriff shall sell under the execution so much of the property, real or personal, as may be necessary to satisfy the balance, if enough real or personal property for that purpose remains in his hands. Notice of the sales shall be given and the sales shall be conducted as in other cases of sales on execution.

After selling all the property attached by the sheriff which remains in his hands, the sheriff shall deduct his fees and apply the proceeds and any debts or credits collected by him, to the payment of the judgment. If any balance remains due on the judgment, the sheriff shall proceed to collect it as upon an execution in other cases. When the judgment is paid in full, the sheriff upon reasonable demand, shall deliver to the defendant the attached property remaining in his hands and any proceeds of the property attached not applied to the judgment.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 136, 137; Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 555; R.S. 1887, §§ 2903, 3552, 3553; R.S. 1899, §§ 4022, 4463, 4464; C.S. 1910, § 4881, 5326, 5327; C.S. 1920, §§ 6151, 6598, 6599, R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1612, 62-1613, 89-3335; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5035, 14-1412, 14-1413; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-260, 1-588, 1-589; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-309, 1-21-318, 1-21-319; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to levy and sale following execution, see §§

1-17-310

through

1-17-341

.

As to seizure of person or property for the purpose of securing satisfaction of judgment, see Rule 64, W.R.C.P.

Order of sale of attached property

may be made subsequent to entry of final judgment for plaintiff. First Nat'l Bank v. Sorenson, 30 Wyo. 136, 217 P. 948,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1923).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Estoppel of or waiver by parties or participants as to irregularities or defects in sale, 2 A.L.R.2d 6.

§ 1-15-209.
Proceedings where defendant prevails.

If the plaintiff does
not recover judgment against the defendant, any undertaking received
in the action, all the proceeds of sales and money collected by the
sheriff and all the property attached remaining in his hands shall
be delivered to the defendant, and the attachment shall be discharged
and the property released therefrom.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 139; Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 554; R.S. 1887, §§ 2902, 3555; R.S. 1899, §§ 4021, 4466; C.S. 1910, §§ 4880, 5329; C.S. 1920, §§ 6150, 6601; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1615, 89-3334; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5034, 14-1415; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-259, 1-591; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-308, 1-21-321; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-210.
Release of attachment upon real property.

If the plaintiff does
not recover judgment or an order is made discharging or releasing
an attachment upon real property, a certified copy of the judgment
or order shall be filed and indexed in the office of the county clerk
in which the notice of attachment has been filed.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-211.
Attachment before maturity of claim.

A party may commence
an action upon an obligation before it is due and have an attachment
against the property of the debtor upon any one (1) or more of the
grounds set forth in W.S. 1-15-201(b)(iv)(D) through (F). The property attached, or its proceeds,
shall be held subject to the judgment to be rendered, but no judgment
shall be rendered on the claim until the obligation becomes due.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 564 to 570; R.S. 1887, §§ 2912 to 2918; R.S. 1899, §§ 4031 to 4037; C.S. 1910, §§ 4890 to 4896; C.S. 1920, §§ 6160 to 6166; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3401 to 89-3407; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5101 to 3-5107; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-269 to 1-275; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-15-401

to

1-15-407

; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Actions must be done to hinder, delay and defraud creditors.
—

In attachment proceedings before debt due under this section, disposal or threatened disposal or removal of property or intended nonresidence of defendant, specified as grounds for attachment, must be done to hinder, delay and defraud creditors, the gist of the matter being the fraudulent intent. Bank of Commerce v. Latham, 8 Wyo. 316, 57 P. 184,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1899).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What amounts to debt within statute providing for attachment before debt is due, 58 ALR2d 1451.

What sort of claim, obligation or liability is within contemplation of statute providing for attachment before debt or liability is due, 58 ALR2d 1451.

§ 1-15-212.
Property bound from time of service.

An order of attachment
binds the property attached from the time the writ is executed.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 538; R.S. 1887, § 2886; R.S. 1899, § 4005; C.S. 1910, § 4864; C.S. 1920, § 6134; Laws 1927, ch. 30, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 89-3318; C.S. 1945, § 3-5018; W.S. 1957, § 1-243; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-15-118; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Most of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

The issuing court acquires jurisdiction of the debt upon service of writ

of attachment on garnishee. Great Falls Transfer & Storage Co. v. Pan American Petroleum Corp., 353 F.2d 348, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 3762 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1965).

And garnishee thereupon becomes liable to garnishor to extent of debt

until discharged or any judgment recovered is satisfied. Great Falls Transfer & Storage Co. v. Pan American Petroleum Corp., 353 F.2d 348, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 3762 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1965).

An attachment creates a lien

under the provisions of this section. Platte County State Bank v. Frantz, 33 Wyo. 326, 239 P. 531,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1925).

And garnishee becomes liable to plaintiff from time of service

of the writ, to the amount of any property or indebtedness belonging to or due to the defendant, and is required to make answer to the writ showing such property or debt. Service of the writ upon the garnishee makes the garnishee liable for such property, and not the return, which the officer is required to make to the court of the action taken by him in the service of the writ. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

A garnishment is virtually a process of attachment,

and a garnishee is bound from the time of service. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

It gives the creditor a paramount right,

although not necessarily title, to property as a security for his demand. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Lien rendered complete. —

The filing of suit by lienor, coupled with the subsequent garnishment proceedings, resulting in deposit of the funds, rendered lienor's lien choate in that: (a) the lienor was established; (b) the property subject to the lien had been established and, in fact, seized and placed in the court's custody; and (c) the amount of the lien, excluding fees and interest, had been established by oral judgment. United States v. Hunt, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Priority in time of service of writ of attachment determines superiority

of conflicting attachments or garnishments of the same indebtedness. Great Falls Transfer & Storage Co. v. Pan American Petroleum Corp., 353 F.2d 348, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 3762 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1965).

Priority of mechanic's lien. —

While it is correct that an attachment writ predicated upon a valid judgment properly served creates a lien, except in cases to set aside fraudulent conveyances, this section exempts such property in the hands of the garnishee as may be by law exempt from execution, and thus, a mechanic's lien has priority. Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1974).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).